Nebraska, session 109, LB1226.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1226 LB1226
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 37-420, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-420 (1) Any veteran who is a legal resident of the State of
Nebraska shall, upon application and without payment of any fee, be
issued a combination fishing, fur-harvesting, and hunting permit, habitat
stamp, aquatic habitat stamp, and Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamp if
the veteran:
(a) Was discharged or separated with a characterization of honorable
or general (under honorable conditions); and
(b)(i) Is rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
as fifty percent or more disabled as a result of service in the armed
forces of the United States; or
(ii) Is receiving a pension from the department as a result of total
and permanent disability, which disability was not incurred in the line
of duty in the military service.
(2) Any veteran who is a legal resident of the State of Nebraska
shall, upon application and with payment of a fee of ninety dollars for a
special three-year permit or one hundred thirty-five dollars for a
special five-year permit, be issued a combination fishing and hunting
permit, habitat stamp, aquatic habitat stamp, and Nebraska migratory
waterfowl stamp if the veteran:
(a) Was discharged or separated with a characterization of honorable
or general (under honorable conditions); and
(b) Is rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as
ten percent or more disabled as a result of service in the armed forces
of the United States.
(3) (2) If disabled persons are unable by reason of physical
infirmities to hunt and fish in the normal manner, the commission may
issue special permits without cost to those persons to hunt and fish from
a vehicle, but such permits shall not authorize any person to shoot from
any public highway.
-2-

LB1226 LB1226
2026 2026
(4) (3) All permits issued without the payment of any fees pursuant
to this section shall be perpetual and become void only upon termination
of eligibility as provided in this section.
(5) (4) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out this section.
(6) (5) Permits issued under subdivision (3) of this section as it
existed prior to January 1, 2006, shall not expire as provided in
subsection (1) of section 37-421.
Sec. 2. Original section 37-420, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-